Utah statutes.
58-40-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Board of Recreational Therapy, consisting of:

(a)  two master therapeutic recreation specialists;

(b)  one therapeutic recreation specialist;

(c)  one therapeutic recreation technician; and

(d)  one member of the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3) (a)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

(b)  In addition, the board shall designate one of its members on a permanent rotating basis to:

(i)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(ii)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in the investigation of a complaint may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding relating to the complaint.

